Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2501
Purpose of sections.

The purpose of sections 23-2501 to 23-2516 is to guarantee to all citizens a fair and equal opportunity for employment in the county offices governed by sections 23-2501 to 23-2516, to establish conditions of employment and to promote economy and efficiency in such offices.

Laws 1971, LB 921, § 1.